Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 70. Alaska Business License Act.
Sec. 43.70.110.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“business” means a for profit or nonprofit entity engaging or offering to engage in a trade, a service, a profession, or an activity with the goal of receiving a financial benefit in exchange for the provision of services, or goods or other property;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“electronic smoking product” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(b)

;

“line of business” means the particular trade, service, profession, or activity engaged in by a for-profit or nonprofit entity with the goal of receiving a financial benefit;

“person” includes an individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, estate trust, business trust, receiver, or any group or combination acting as a unit;

“product containing nicotine” does not include a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco.

History.

(§ 2 ch 43 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 172 SLA 1957; am § 72 ch 14 SLA 1987; am E.O. No. 68, § 5 (1988); am § 3 ch 66 SLA 1998; am § 59 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 110 SLA 2014; am § 25 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

The definitions in this section were renumbered in 1988, 2014, and 2018 to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (6) [now (4)] and (7).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although the Pribilof Islands constitute a special reservation, within the meaning of the Buck Act, 4 USC 105-110, the operations of businesses, including performing contractors’ work for the federal government, are not exempt from state taxation. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Mere contracts between private persons or corporations and the United States do not necessarily render the former essential governmental agencies and confer upon them freedom from state taxation. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

The principle of immunity from state and local taxation is generally based upon the direct ownership or use and control of the property by the United States, and does not extend to the business, property, or income of contractors who are doing work for the federal government for the purpose of gain. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Where most of the business activities of a company took place in Missouri, it being very difficult to directly allocate that portion of the company’s profits or income which was derived from its Alaska operations, the company carried on enough activities in Alaska to become subject to state taxation and these activities could be taxed on an indirect allocation formula. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Persons receiving in excess of $1500 gross per year from the supplying of part of their home to others and who claim business deductions on their Alaska income tax return for that same part of their home are required to obtain an Alaska business license. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

When an individual claims that part of his property is business property for income tax purposes, that same part of his property does not come within the meaning of the words “personal home” in §§ 1 and 15 of the business license regulations. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

An individual may not claim a reduction of state income tax on the grounds that part of his home is business property and then escape the state business license tax on the basis that the same part of his home is not a business property but his personal home. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 20.

Rents received by religious corporations are not exempted from the Alaska business license tax. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 25.

Sec. 43.70.120.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Business License Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 1949)